Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.144

Payment of accumulated contributions or retirement allowance upon death—Election.

(1) If a judge dies before the date of retirement, the amount of the accumulated contributions standing to the judge's credit at the time of death shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the judge has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department of retirement systems. If there is no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the judge's death, or if the judge fails to file a new beneficiary designation subsequent to marriage, remarriage, dissolution of marriage, divorce, or reestablishment of membership following termination by withdrawal or retirement, the judge's credited accumulated contributions shall be paid to the surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation or, if there is no such surviving spouse, then to the judge's legal representatives.

(2) Upon the death in service of any judge who is qualified but has not applied for a service retirement allowance or has completed ten years of service at the time of death, the designated beneficiary, or the surviving spouse as provided in subsection (1) of this section, may elect to waive the payment provided by subsection (1) of this section. Upon such an election, a joint and one hundred percent survivor option under RCW 2.10.146 shall automatically be given effect as if selected for the benefit of the surviving spouse or dependent who is the designated beneficiary, except that if the judge is not then qualified for a service retirement allowance, the option II benefit shall be based upon the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay the accrued regular retirement allowance commencing when the deceased judge would have first qualified for a service retirement allowance. However, subsection (1) of this section, unless elected, shall not apply to any judge who has applied for a service retirement and thereafter dies between the date of separation from service and the judge's effective retirement date, where the judge has selected a survivorship option under RCW 2.10.146(1)(b). In those cases, the beneficiary named in the judge's final application for service retirement may elect to receive either a cash refund or monthly payments according to the option selected by the judge.

[ 1995 c 144 s 20; 1990 c 249 s 13; 1988 c 109 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—1990 c 249: See note following RCW 2.10.146.

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.